Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-224
Special event bingo, defined.

Special event bingo shall mean the conduct of bingo as provided in section 9-230.01 by a qualifying nonprofit organization in conjunction with a special event.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 23.